Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201679-245
Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act; applicability.

The Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act shall apply to the enrollment option program as provided in this section. For purposes of the act, option students shall not be counted as formula students by the resident school district and shall be counted as formula students by the option school district.

Laws 1989, LB 183, § 15;

Laws 1990, LB 843, § 12;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 69;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 74;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3415;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 49;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 5;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 9;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 19.
July 21, 2016
Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act, see section 79-1001.